Nebraska, session 109, LB309.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB309 LB309
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 17 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Safe Battery Collection and Recycling Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Safe Battery Collection and Recycling
Act:
(1)(a) Battery containing product means a product that contains or
is packaged with a covered battery.
(b) Battery containing product does not include computers, small-
scale servers, computer monitors, electronic keyboards and mice,
printers, fax machines, scanners, televisions, digital video disc players
and recorders, video cassette recorders, digital converter boxes, cable
receivers, satellite receivers, portable digital music players, and video
game consoles;
(2) Battery stewardship organization means an organization
designated by a producer or a group of five or more producers that
directly implements a battery stewardship plan approved by the department
under section 4 of this act;
(3) Collection rate means the percentage calculated by dividing the
total weight of covered batteries collected in this state by a battery
stewardship organization in a calendar year by the average annual weight
of covered batteries estimated to have been sold in this state by all
producers during the previous three calendar years;
(4)(a) Covered battery means a portable battery or a medium format
battery.
(b) Covered battery does not include:
(i) A battery that is contained in a medical device regulated under
the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. 301 et seq., and that
is not designed or marketed for sale or resale at retail locations for
personal use;
(ii) A battery that contains an electrolyte as a free liquid or a
product that contains such a battery;
(iii) A battery designed to power a motor vehicle, part of a motor
-2-

LB309 LB309
2025 2025
vehicle, or a component part of a motor vehicle assembled by, or for, a
vehicle manufacturer or franchised dealer, including replacement parts
for use in a motor vehicle;
(iv) A battery in a product that is not intended or designed to be
easily removable from the product; or
(v) A battery or battery containing product that is being recalled
for safety reasons;
(5) Department means the Department of Environment and Energy;
(6) Medium format battery means any of the following:
(a) For batteries that are not capable of being recharged, a battery
that weighs more than four and four-tenths pounds but not more than
twenty-five pounds; or
(b) For rechargeable batteries, a battery that weighs more than
eleven pounds or that has a rating of more than three hundred watt-hours,
or both, but that does not weigh more than twenty-five pounds or have a
rating of more than two thousand watt-hours;
(7) Portable battery means any of the following:
(a) For batteries that are not capable of being recharged, a battery
that weighs no more than four and four-tenths pounds; or
(b) For rechargeable batteries, a battery that weighs no more than
eleven pounds and that has a rating of no more than three hundred watt-
hours;
(8)(a) Producer means a person that sells, offers for sale, or
distributes for sale a covered battery or battery containing product in
or into this state and that is any of the following:
(i) If the covered battery or battery containing product is sold
under a brand of the battery's or product's manufacturer, the person that
manufactures the battery or product;
(ii) If the covered battery or battery containing product is sold
under a retail brand or under a brand owned by a person other than the
battery's or product's manufacturer, the person that owns the brand;
-3-

LB309 LB309
2025 2025
(iii) If subdivisions (8)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section do not
apply, the person that is the licensee of a brand or trademark under
which the covered battery or battery containing product is sold, offered
for sale, or distributed for sale in or into this state, regardless of
whether the trademark is registered in this state;
(iv) If subdivisions (8)(a)(i) to (iii) of this section do not apply
to any person within the United States, the person that is the importer
of record for the covered battery or battery containing product into the
United States for the purpose of selling, offering for sale, or
distributing for sale the battery or product in or into this state; or
(v) If subdivisions (8)(a)(i) to (iv) of this section do not apply
to any person with a commercial presence in this state, the person who
first sells, offers for sale, or distributes for sale the covered battery
or battery containing product in or into this state.
(b) Producer does not include a person that only sells, offers for
sale, or distributes for sale a battery containing product if the battery
is supplied by another producer that has designated a battery stewardship
organization to implement a battery stewardship plan and if the producer
certifies this fact in writing to the person that only sells, offers for
sale, or distributes for sale the battery containing product;
(9) Rechargeable battery means a battery that contains one or more
voltaic or galvanic cells electrically connected to produce electric
energy and that is designed to be recharged;
(10)(a) Recycling means preparing batteries for use in manufacturing
processes or for recovery of usable materials and delivering the
materials for use.
(b) Recycling does not include destruction by incineration or other
processes or land disposal of recyclable materials and does not include
reuse, repair, or any other process through which batteries are returned
in their original form;
(11) Recycling efficiency rate means the percentage calculated by
-4-

LB309 LB309
2025 2025
dividing the weight of components and materials recycled by a battery
stewardship organization by the weight of covered batteries collected by
the battery stewardship organization; and
(12) Retailer means a person that sells or offers for sale a covered
battery in or into this state.
Sec. 3. (1) Beginning January 1, 2028, no producer or retailer may
sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale in or into this state any
covered battery or battery containing product unless the producer of the
covered battery or battery containing product is a member of a battery
stewardship organization operating under a battery stewardship plan
approved by the department under section 4 of this act. This subsection
does not apply to a retailer if the website maintained by the department
under section 9 of this act lists, as of the date a battery or product is
made available for retail sale, the producer or brand of the battery or
product as being covered by a battery stewardship plan approved by the
department under section 4 of this act.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2028, no producer or retailer may sell,
offer for sale, or distribute for sale in or into this state any covered
battery or battery containing product unless the covered battery or
battery in the battery containing product is marked with an
identification of the producer of the battery. This subsection does not
apply if the battery is less than one-half inch in diameter or does not
contain a surface with a length that exceeds one-half inch.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2029, no producer or retailer may sell,
offer for sale, or distribute for sale in or into this state any covered
battery or battery containing product unless the covered battery or
battery in the battery containing product is marked to ensure proper
collection and recycling by:
(a) Identifying the chemistry of the battery; and
(b) Including an indication that the battery should not be disposed
of as household waste. This subdivision does not apply if the battery is
-5-

LB309 LB309
2025 2025
less than one-half inch in diameter or does not contain a surface with a
length that exceeds one-half inch.
(4) A producer, retailer, or battery stewardship organization may
not charge a point-of-sale fee to consumers to cover the costs of
implementing a battery stewardship plan approved by the department under
section 4 of this act.
Sec. 4. (1) Each battery stewardship organization shall submit a
battery stewardship plan to the department for review and approval by
January 1, 2027.
(2) A battery stewardship plan shall have a term of no more than
five years and shall include all of the following:
(a) The names and contact information for each producer member
covered under a battery stewardship organization's plan;
(b) The brands of all of the covered batteries that the battery
stewardship organization's producer members sell, offer for sale, or
distribute for sale in or into this state. All such brands shall be
covered by the battery stewardship plan;
(c) Performance goals under the plan and a process for achieving
these goals. Performance goals shall include target collection rates for
rechargeable batteries and for batteries that are not capable of being
recharged; target recycling efficiency rates of at least sixty percent
for rechargeable batteries and seventy percent for batteries that are not
capable of being recharged; and goals for public awareness, convenience,
and accessibility. The collection rate goals for each of the first three
years of implementation of the battery stewardship plan shall be based on
the estimated total weight of covered batteries that have been sold in
this state in the previous three calendar years by the producers
participating in the plan;
(d) A process for making retailers aware of the prohibitions
contained in section 3 of this act;
(e) Consumer awareness goals and a description of the education and
-6-

LB309 LB309
2025 2025
outreach strategy that the battery stewardship organization will
implement pursuant to section 7 of this act;
(f) A process for making available to collection sites, for
voluntary use, signage, written materials, and other promotional
materials to inform consumers of the available end-of-life management
options for covered batteries collected under the battery stewardship
plan;
(g) Collection site safety training procedures related to covered
battery collection activities at collection sites, including a
description of operating protocols to reduce risks of spills or fires,
response protocols in the event of a spill or fire, and protocols for
safe management of damaged batteries that are returned to collection
sites;
(h) A method for fully funding the battery stewardship
organization's plan in a manner that equitably distributes the plan's
costs among the members of the battery stewardship organization;
(i) Provisions for collecting covered batteries at no cost,
regardless of the brand or producer of the covered battery, on a
continuous, convenient, visible, and accessible basis and a description
of how the battery stewardship organization will comply with section 6 of
this act;
(j) The addresses of collection sites that will accept covered
batteries under the plan and the criteria used to determine whether an
entity may serve as a collection site;
(k) The names of proposed service providers, including sorters,
transporters, and processors, to be used for the final disposition of
batteries;
(l) Provisions for recordkeeping, tracking, and documenting the
management and disposition of collected covered batteries; and
(m) An explanation for any delay anticipated by the battery
stewardship organization in managing medium format batteries.
-7-

LB309 LB309
2025 2025
(3) A battery stewardship organization whose battery stewardship
plan is approved under this section shall submit a new plan to the
department for approval no less than once every five years. If the
performance goals under the previously approved plan have not been met,
the new plan shall include corrective measures to be implemented by the
battery stewardship organization to meet those performance goals, which
may include improvements to the collection site network or increased
expenditures dedicated to education and outreach.
(4) A battery stewardship organization whose battery stewardship
plan is approved under this section shall provide plan amendments to the
department for approval when proposing any material changes to an
approved plan.
(5)(a) Within one hundred twenty days after receiving a proposed
battery stewardship plan or a proposed amendment described in subsection
(4) of this section, the department shall approve, conditionally approve,
or deny the plan or amendment.
(b) If the department denies the plan or amendment:
(i) The department shall notify the battery stewardship organization
of the denial in writing and explain how the proposed plan or amendment
does not comply with the Safe Battery Collection and Recycling Act;
(ii) The battery stewardship organization shall submit a revised
plan or amendment or notice of plan or amendment withdrawal within sixty
days after the denial; and
(iii) The department shall approve or deny the revised plan or
amendment within ninety days after resubmittal. The denial of a revised
plan or amendment may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(6) A battery stewardship organization operating under a plan
approved by the department under this section shall notify the department
within ninety days of a producer beginning or ceasing participation in
the battery stewardship organization, or within ninety days of adding or
-8-

LB309 LB309
2025 2025
removing a processor or transporter under the approved plan.
(7) A battery stewardship organization shall pay a fee of one
hundred thousand dollars to the department upon approval of a plan under
this section or on January 1, 2027, whichever is later, and a fee of one
hundred thousand dollars annually thereafter. Fees paid under this
subsection shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Battery Stewardship Fund.
Sec. 5. A battery stewardship organization implementing a battery
stewardship plan approved under section 4 of this act shall:
(1) Be responsible for all costs associated with implementing the
plan;
(2) Reimburse local governmental units for demonstrable costs
incurred as a result of a local government facility or solid waste
facility serving as a collection site under the plan; and
(3) Collect charges from participating producers sufficient to cover
the costs of implementation, including battery collection,
transportation, and processing, education and outreach, program
evaluation, and payment of the annual fee to the department under section
4 of this act.
Sec. 6. (1) A battery stewardship organization implementing a
battery stewardship plan approved under section 4 of this act shall do
all of the following:
(a) Provide for the collection of all covered batteries from any
person, regardless of the chemistry or brand of the battery, on a free,
continuous, convenient, visible, and accessible basis;
(b) Provide to collection sites under the plan, at no cost to the
sites, suitable collection containers for covered batteries that are
segregated from other solid waste, or make alternative arrangements for
the collection of such batteries at the site, with the agreement of the
collection site;
(c) Ensure that medium format batteries are collected only at
-9-

LB309 LB309
2025 2025
household hazardous waste collection sites or other staffed collection
sites that meet applicable federal, state, and local requirements for
managing medium format batteries;
(d) Provide for the collection of damaged and defective batteries,
by persons trained to handle and ship such batteries, at collection sites
and at each permanent household hazardous waste facility and each
household hazardous waste collection event provided by the department. As
used in this subdivision, damaged and defective batteries means batteries
that have been damaged or that have been identified by the manufacturer
as being defective for safety reasons and that have the potential to
produce a dangerous evolution of heat or fire or short circuit;
(e) Ensure statewide collection opportunities for all covered
batteries;
(f) Coordinate activities with others, such as electronic waste
recyclers and other battery stewardship organizations, to provide
efficient delivery of services and avoid unnecessary duplication of
effort and expense. A battery stewardship organization shall use existing
public and private waste collection services and facilities,
transporters, consolidators, processors, and retailers if cost effective,
mutually agreeable, and otherwise practical;
(g) For portable batteries, provide all of the following within
three years after approval of the battery stewardship plan:
(i) At least one permanent collection site within a fifteen-mile
radius for at least ninety-five percent of state residents; and
(ii) At least one permanent collection site, collection service, or
collection event for every thirty thousand residents of a county;
(h) For medium format batteries, provide all of the following within
three years after approval of the battery stewardship plan:
(i) At least ten permanent collection sites in this state. Such
sites must be reasonably dispersed throughout the state; and
(ii) A collection event at least once every three years in each
-10-

LB309 LB309
2025 2025
county that does not have a permanent collection site, which must provide
for the collection of all medium format batteries, including damaged and
defective medium format batteries; and
(i) Use as a collection site or the site of a collection event any
entity that meets the criteria for a collection site or collection event
under an approved battery stewardship plan and that requests to serve as
a collection site or collection event, up to the number of collection
sites required to comply with subdivisions (1)(g) and (h) of this
section.
(2) A battery stewardship organization implementing a battery
stewardship plan approved under section 4 of this act may issue a warning
to, suspend, or terminate a collection site or service that does not
comply with the criteria contained in the approved plan or that poses an
immediate concern to health and safety.
(3) A battery stewardship organization is not required to provide
for the collection of battery containing products, covered batteries that
remain contained in a battery containing product at the time of delivery
to a collection site or collection event, or batteries or battery
containing products being recalled for safety reasons. A battery
stewardship organization may seek reimbursement from the producer of a
battery or battery containing product being recalled for safety reasons
for the costs incurred in collecting, transporting, or processing such
batteries and products.
Sec. 7. A battery stewardship organization implementing a battery
stewardship plan approved under section 4 of this act shall do all of the
following to promote the implementation of the plan:
(1) Develop and maintain a website;
(2) Develop and place advertisements on social media or other
relevant media platforms;
(3) Develop promotional materials about the program and about the
restrictions on disposing of covered batteries under section 12 of this
-11-

LB309 LB309
2025 2025
act;
(4) Develop and distribute collection site safety training
procedures to collection sites to help ensure proper management of
covered batteries at collection sites;
(5) Provide consumer-focused educational materials, to each
collection site used under the plan, that are accessible by customers of
retailers that sell covered batteries or battery containing products;
(6) Provide safety information related to covered battery collection
activities to the operator of each collection site used under the plan,
including appropriate protocols to reduce risks of spills or fires, to
respond to a spill or fire, and to manage a collected damaged or
defective battery;
(7) Provide educational materials to the operator of each collection
site used under the plan for the management of recalled batteries;
(8) Upon request by a retailer or other potential collection site,
provide educational materials describing collection opportunities for
covered batteries;
(9) Coordinate with other battery stewardship organizations
implementing a battery stewardship plan in providing education and
outreach under this section; and
(10) Conduct a survey, during the first year of implementing a
battery stewardship plan and once every five years thereafter, of public
awareness of the outreach efforts undertaken pursuant to this section.
The battery stewardship organization shall share the results of the
surveys with the department.
Sec. 8. (1) No later than June 1, 2029, and no later than June 1 of
each year thereafter, a battery stewardship organization implementing a
battery stewardship plan approved under section 4 of this act shall
submit to the department a report that includes:
(a) A summary financial statement documenting the financing of the
plan and an analysis of plan costs and expenditures, including an
-12-

LB309 LB309
2025 2025
analysis of the plan's expenses, such as collection, transportation,
recycling, education, and administrative overhead. The summary financial
statement shall be sufficiently detailed to provide transparency that
funds collected from producers are spent on plan implementation in this
state;
(b) The weight, by chemistry, of covered batteries collected under
the plan;
(c) The weight of materials recycled from covered batteries
collected under the plan, in total, and by method of battery recycling;
(d) A calculation of the recycling efficiency rate under the plan;
(e) A list of all facilities used in the processing or disposition
of covered batteries under the plan and a summary of any violations of
environmental laws and regulations during the previous three years at
each facility;
(f) For each facility used for the final disposition of covered
batteries under the plan, a description of how the facility recycled or
otherwise managed batteries and battery components;
(g) The weight and chemistry of covered batteries sent to each
facility that is used for the final disposition of batteries. This
information may be approximated based on extrapolations of national or
regional data for programs in operation in multiple states;
(h) The collection rate achieved under the plan, including a
description of how this collection rate was calculated and how it
compares to the collection rate goals under the plan;
(i) The estimated aggregate sales, by weight and chemistry, of
covered batteries, including covered batteries contained in or packaged
with battery containing products, sold in this state by the battery
stewardship organization's participating producers for each of the
previous three calendar years;
(j) A description of how collected batteries were managed and
recycled, including a discussion of best available technologies and the
-13-

LB309 LB309
2025 2025
recycling efficiency rate;
(k) A description of education and outreach efforts supporting plan
implementation, including:
(i) A summary of education and outreach provided to consumers,
collection sites, manufacturers, distributors, and retailers to promote
the collection and recycling of covered batteries;
(ii) A description of how that education and outreach met the
requirements of section 7 of this act;
(iii) Samples of education and outreach materials;
(iv) A summary of coordinated education and outreach efforts with
any other battery stewardship organizations implementing a battery
stewardship plan; and
(v) A summary of any changes made during the previous calendar year
to education and outreach activities;
(l) A list of all collection sites used to implement the plan, an
address for each listed site, a link to the website of each listed site,
if available, and an up-to-date map indicating the location of each site;
(m) A description of methods used to collect, transport, and recycle
covered batteries under the plan;
(n) A summary of progress made toward the performance goals under
the plan, and an explanation of why performance goals were not met, if
applicable;
(o) An evaluation of the effectiveness of education and outreach
activities; and
(p) If a battery stewardship organization has disposed of covered
batteries through energy recovery, incineration, or landfilling during
the preceding calendar year of plan implementation, the steps that the
battery stewardship organization will take to make the recycling of
covered batteries cost-effective, when possible, or to otherwise increase
battery recycling efficiency rates achieved by the battery stewardship
organization.
-14-

LB309 LB309
2025 2025
(2) After five years of implementation of an approved battery
stewardship plan, a battery stewardship organization or a producer member
of such organization shall hire an independent third party to conduct a
one-time audit of the battery stewardship plan and plan operation. The
auditor shall examine the effectiveness of the battery stewardship plan
in collecting and recycling covered batteries. The auditor shall also
examine the cost-effectiveness of the plan and compare it to the cost-
effectiveness of collections plans and programs for covered batteries in
other jurisdictions. A copy of such audit shall be submitted to the
department.
Sec. 9. (1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall include on its website:
(a) A copy of all battery stewardship plans approved under section 4
of this act and any amendments to such plans;
(b) The names of the producer members covered under an approved
battery stewardship plan;
(c) A list of brands of covered batteries covered under an approved
battery stewardship plan; and
(d) A copy of each annual report submitted to the department under
subsection (1) of section 8 of this act.
(2) Any proprietary information submitted to the department under
this section shall not be included on the department's website and shall
not be subject to public disclosure pursuant to sections 84-712 to
84-712.09.
Sec. 10. A producer, retailer, or battery stewardship organization
is not liable for any claim of a violation of antitrust laws or laws
relating to fraudulent, deceptive, or unfair methods of competition or
trade practices arising from conduct that complies with a battery
stewardship plan approved under section 4 of this act.
Sec. 11. Nothing in the Safe Battery Collection and Recycling Act
prevents or prohibits a person from offering or performing a fee-based
-15-

LB309 LB309
2025 2025
household collection program or a mail-back program for covered batteries
independently of a battery stewardship plan if:
(1) The services are performed and any facilities are operated in
compliance with all applicable federal, state, and local laws and
requirements;
(2) All batteries collected by the person from customers in this
state are provided to a battery stewardship organization implementing a
battery stewardship plan approved under section 4 of this act; and
(3) After providing collected batteries to a battery stewardship
organization, any transport and processing of such batteries by the
battery stewardship organization is done at the battery stewardship
organization's expense.
Sec. 12. (1) Beginning January 1, 2028, all of the following shall
apply:
(a) A person may dispose of a covered battery only by delivery to a
collection site or collection event operated under a battery stewardship
plan approved under section 4 of this act, unless the battery is
regulated as hazardous waste;
(b) No person may knowingly cause or allow the mixing of a covered
battery with recyclable materials that are intended for processing and
sorting at a material recovery facility;
(c) No person may knowingly cause or allow the mixing of a covered
battery with municipal waste that is intended for disposal at a landfill;
(d) No person may knowingly cause or allow the disposal of a covered
battery in a landfill;
(e) No person may knowingly cause or allow the mixing of a covered
battery with waste that is intended for burning or incineration; and
(f) No person may knowingly cause or allow the burning or
incineration of a covered battery.
(2) An owner or operator of a solid waste facility may not be found
in violation of this section if the facility has posted in a conspicuous
-16-

LB309 LB309
2025 2025
location a sign stating that covered batteries must be managed through
collection sites established by a battery stewardship organization and
are not accepted for disposal.
(3) A solid waste collector may not be found in violation of this
section for a covered battery placed in a disposal container by a third
party.
Sec. 13. (1) Any person who violates the Safe Battery Collection
and Recycling Act, other than a violation of section 12 of this act,
shall be subject to a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars for each
violation. Any person who fails to pay the fee required under subsection
(7) of section 4 of this act shall also be subject to a civil penalty of
ten thousand dollars.
(2) A person who knowingly makes a false material statement to the
department related to a battery stewardship plan submitted under section
4 of this act shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.
(3) The Attorney General or the county attorney of any county in
which a violation of the act occurs may, in addition to any other
penalty, bring an action to enjoin any person from violating the act,
other than a violation of section 12 of this act.
(4) All civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with
Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 14. (1) The department shall review and evaluate the studies
and assessments carried out by Illinois, Vermont, and Washington
regarding whether products or batteries that are not currently covered by
the Safe Battery Collection and Recycling Act should be covered at a
later date. The department may review similar studies or assessments
carried out by any other state or person.
(2) No later than May 30, 2028, the department shall electronically
submit a report to the Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature.
The report shall include the findings and recommendations of any study or
-17-

LB309 LB309
2025 2025
assessment reviewed by the department under this section. The report may
include recommendations for legislation based on the department's
evaluation of the studies and assessments reviewed by the department.
Sec. 15. (1) A battery stewardship organization implementing an
approved battery stewardship plan may bring a civil action or actions to
recover costs, damages, and fees, as specified in this subsection, from a
producer who sells or otherwise makes available in Nebraska covered
batteries or battery containing products not included under an approved
plan in violation of the requirements of the Safe Battery Collection and
Recycling Act. An action under this subsection may be brought against one
or more defendants. An action under this subsection shall only be brought
against a defendant producer if the battery stewardship organization
incurs costs in Nebraska, including legal fees and expenses and
reasonable incremental administrative and program promotional costs, in
excess of one thousand dollars to collect, transport, and recycle or
otherwise dispose of the covered batteries or battery containing products
of a nonparticipating producer.
(2) A battery stewardship organization implementing an approved
battery stewardship plan may bring a civil action against a producer of a
recalled battery to recover costs associated with handling the recalled
battery, including legal fees and expenses.
(3) A battery stewardship organization implementing an approved
battery stewardship plan may bring a civil action against another battery
stewardship organization that underperforms on its battery collection
obligations under the Safe Battery Collection and Recycling Act by
failing to collect and provide for the end-of-life management of
batteries in an amount roughly equivalent to costs imposed on the
plaintiff battery stewardship organization by virtue of the failures of
the defendant battery stewardship organization, plus legal fees and
expenses.
Sec. 16. The Battery Stewardship Cash Fund is created. The fund
-18-

LB309 LB309
2025 2025
shall consist of fees collected under section 4 of this act. The fund
shall be administered by the department and shall only be used for
purposes of carrying out the Safe Battery Collection and Recycling Act.
Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 17. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Safe Battery Collection and Recycling Act.
-19-